Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202086-1210
Collocate or collocation, defined.

Collocate or collocation means to install, mount, maintain, modify, operate, or replace small wireless facilities on or adjacent to a wireless support structure or utility pole. Collocate or collocation does not include the installation of a new utility pole or new wireless support structure in the right-of-way.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 10.